Utah statutes.
31A-23a-407.   Liability of title insurers for acts of title insurance producers.

Any title company, represented by one or more title insurance producers, is directly and primarily liable to others dealing with the title insurance producers for the receipt and disbursement of funds deposited in escrows with the title insurance producers in all those transactions where a commitment or binder for or policy or contract of title insurance of that title insurance company has been ordered, or a preliminary report of the title insurance company has been issued or distributed.  This liability does not modify, mitigate, impair, or affect the contractual obligations between the title insurance producers and the title insurance company.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 298, 2003 General Session

